Massachusetts, session 194th, S1149.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 6B of chapter 231 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 5, the words “at the rate of twelve per 
cent per annum” and inserting in place thereof the following:- calculated at a weekly average 1-
year constant maturity treasury yield, as published by the Board of Governors of the Federal 
Reserve System, for the calendar week preceding date of the judgment.  
SECTION 2. Section 6C of said chapter 231 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “at the rate of twelve per cent per annum” 
and inserting in place thereof the following:- calculated at a weekly average 1-year constant 
maturity treasury yield, as published by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, 
for the calendar week preceding date of the judgment. 

of 2 11  SECTION 3. Said section 6C of said chapter 231, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out, in line 7, the words “at the rate of twelve per cent annum” and inserting 
in place thereof the following:- calculated as set forth above.